Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 5 Hours of Labor

Cross references. —

As to hours of labor for children, see §

27-6-110

.

For constitutional provision as to hours of labor, see art. 19, § 2, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

48 Am. Jur. 2d Labor and Labor Relations §§ 2625, 2636, 2637.

Who is employed in “professional capacity” within exemption, under 29 USC § 213(a)(1), from minimum wage and maximum hours provisions of Fair Labor Standards Act, 77 ALR Fed 681.

What constitutes “amusement or recreational establishment” within meaning of seasonal amusement exemption from Fair Labor Standards Act (29 USC § 213(a)(3)), 88 ALR Fed 880.

Employee's protection under § 15(a)(3) of Fair Labor Standards Act (29 USC § 215(a)(3)), 101 ALR Fed 220.

§ 27-5-101.
State and county employees; overtime compensation.

The period of employment of state and county employees is eight (8) hours per day and forty (40) hours per week which constitute a lawful day’s and week’s work respectively.

Except for employees whose maximum salary is remitted by statute, any state or county employee may be compensated at a rate one and one-half (1 1/2) times their regular compensation for each hour of service required to be performed in excess of eight (8) hours per day and forty (40) hours per week. If overtime compensation is paid pursuant to this section, no additional benefits, including compensatory time off, shall be allowed to the employee receiving the overtime compensation.

Overtime compensation may only be authorized by the appropriate employing governing body subject to the following:

For employees of the executive branch of state government, pursuant to rules and regulations of the human resources division of the department of administration and information. The human resources division shall specify what employees may receive overtime compensation, may require notification of an intent to pay overtime compensation preceding rendering of the additional services, and may prescribe any other limitations deemed desirable;

For employees of the legislative branch of state government, pursuant to rules and regulations of the management council of the legislative service office or resolution of the legislature;

For employees of the judicial branch of state government, pursuant to rules and regulations of the Wyoming supreme court;

For county employees, pursuant to rules and regulations of the respective boards of county commissioners.

History.

Laws 1974, ch. 4, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-211.1; Laws 1991, ch. 29, § 3; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 2001, ch. 162, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to salaries of certain state officers and employees, see §

9-3-101

.

Editor's notes. —

Section 3, ch. 4, Laws 1974, reads as follows: “This act operates prospectively only and does not permit overtime compensation for services rendered prior to July 1, 1974. This act shall not apply to any employee covered by the provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended.”

No additional money for county employees required to work 40hours per week. —

Employees of the county assessor, employed as full-time employees, enjoying all the benefits of full-time employees as opposed to part-time employees, and paid as full-time employees for eight hours work per day, although they worked only seven hours a day, were not required to be paid additional money for the extra 20 hours per month they were now required to work. All that had really occurred was that the taxpayers were finally receiving the work that they have been paying for — that is, a 40-hour work week. Greub v. Frith, 717 P.2d 323,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 522

(Wyo. 1986).

County to authorize overtime pay for emergencies. —

There is no foundation in this section on which to construct a claim for additional compensation where: (1) the employee voluntarily enters into an agreement to work more than eight hours a day and 40 hours a week; or (2) the county has not established rules and regulations governing authorization of overtime pay for emergency services. Cyr v. Board of County Comm'rs, 780 P.2d 986,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and construction of domestic service provisions of fair labor standards act (29 U.S.C. §§ 201 et seq.), 165 ALR Fed 163.

§ 27-5-102.
Working day; mines generally.

The lawful working day in all underground mines is eight (8) hours per day, except:

In case of emergency;

By mutual agreement between an employer and employee or employees’ representative for a longer period of employment, but not to exceed sixteen (16) hours in any twenty-four (24) hour period.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 17, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 3499; C.S. 1920, § 4422; Laws 1931, ch. 73, § 62; R.S. 1931, § 63-103; C.S. 1945, § 54-802; W.S. 1957, § 27-212; Laws 1979, ch. 87, § 2.

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision that eight hours actual work shall constitute a lawful day's work in all mines, see art. 19, § 2, Wyo. Const.

As to mines, and oil and gas wells generally, see title 30.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Construction of act. —

Section 3, ch. 87, Laws 1979, reads: “Nothing in this act may be construed so as to alter the provisions of any collective bargaining contract.”

§§ 27-5-103 through 27-5-107.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 87, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1880-91, ch. 83, §§ 2 through 4, and Laws 1909, ch. 17, §§ 2 and 3, related to the working day in certain mining work.

§ 27-5-108.
Punitive action prohibited; penalty.

Any employer who takes or threatens punitive action against any employee who refuses to work more than eight (8) hours in any twenty-four (24) hour period, except as provided by W.S.

27-5-102

, is guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to the penalty provided by W.S.

27-5-110

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 87, § 1.

§ 27-5-109.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Emergency” means any condition which, if not corrected immediately, will jeopardize:

Human life; or

Property.

“Employer” means any owner, lessee, agent, operator or manager of any underground mine;

“Punitive action” means to discharge, suspend or reprimand or threaten to discharge, suspend or reprimand, or diminish or threaten to diminish in any way any person’s position or salary for refusing to work more than eight (8) hours in any twenty-four (24) hour period, in other than an emergency situation;

“Working day” means eight (8) hours of employment in any twenty-four (24) hour period;

“This act” means W.S.

27-5-102

,

27-5-108

,

27-5-109

and

27-5-110

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 87, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 27-5-110.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this act [§§

27-5-102

,

27-5-108

,

27-5-109

and

27-5-110

] is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction, for each offense, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 87, § 1.

Construction of act. —

Section 3, ch. 87, Laws 1979, reads: “Nothing in this act may be construed so as to alter the provisions of any collective bargaining contract.”